Louisiana, session 2026, HB265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:283(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:283(A)(4),
(D), and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§283. Video voyeurism; penalties
A. Video voyeurism is any of the following:
* * *
(4) The use of any camera, videotape, photo-optical, photo-electric, or any
other image recording device or an unmanned aircraft system equipped with any
camera, videotape, photo-optical, photo-electric, or any other image recording device
for the purpose of observing, viewing, photographing, filming, or videotaping the
body of a deceased person.
* * *
C. The provisions of this This Section shall does not apply to any of the
following:
(1) Any law enforcement officer in his official capacity while in the
performance of his official duties.
(2) the The transference of such images by a telephone company, cable
television company, or any of its affiliates, an Internet provider, or commercial
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 265 ENROLLED
online service provider, or to the carrying, broadcasting, or performing of related
activities in providing telephone, cable television, Internet, or commercial online
services.
(3) Any bona fide news or public interest broadcast, website, video, report,
or event and shall not be construed to affect the rights of any news-gathering
organization.
(4) The use of any camera, videotape, photo-optical, photo-electric, or other
image recording device, or an unmanned aircraft system equipped with such devices,
when used in connection with a lawful funeral service, memorial service, graveside
service, or other end-of-life ceremony conducted by or with the consent of the
decedent's next of kin or authorized representative.
F. D. A violation of the provisions Paragraph (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this
Section shall be is considered a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541. Whoever
commits the crime of video voyeurism shall be in violation of Paragraph (A)(1), (2),
or (3) of this Section is required to register as a sex offender as provided for in
Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
G. E. For the purposes of this Section, "unmanned aircraft system" means
an unmanned, powered aircraft that does not carry a human operator, can be
autonomous or remotely piloted or operated, and can be expendable or recoverable.
H. This Section shall not apply to any bona fide news or public interest
broadcast, website, video, report, or event and shall not be construed to affect the
rights of any news-gathering organization.
Section 2. R.S. 15:541(24)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§541. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the definitions of terms in this Section shall
apply:
* * *
(24)(a) "Sex offense" means deferred adjudication, adjudication withheld,
or conviction for the perpetration or attempted perpetration of or conspiracy to
commit human trafficking when prosecuted under the provisions of R.S.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 265 ENROLLED
14:46.2(B)(2), R.S. 14:46.3 (trafficking of children for sexual purposes), R.S. 14:89
(crime against nature), R.S. 14:89.1 (aggravated crime against nature), R.S.
14:89.2(B)(3) (crime against nature by solicitation), R.S. 14:80 (felony carnal
knowledge of a juvenile), R.S. 14:81 (indecent behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1
(pornography involving juveniles) which occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S.
14:81.2 (molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or mental disability),
R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-aided solicitation of a minor), R.S. 14:81.4 (prohibited
sexual conduct between an educator and student), R.S. 14:82.1 (prostitution; persons
under eighteen), R.S. 14:82.2(C)(4) or (5) (purchase of commercial sexual activity),
R.S. 14:83(B)(2) or (3) (soliciting for prostitutes), R.S. 14:92(A)(7) (contributing to
the delinquency of juveniles), R.S. 14:93.5 (sexual battery of persons with
infirmities), R.S. 14:106(A)(5) (obscenity by solicitation of a person under the age
of seventeen), R.S. 14:283(A)(1), (2), or (3) (video voyeurism), R.S. 14:41 (rape),
R.S. 14:42 (aggravated or first degree rape), R.S. 14:42.1 (forcible or second degree
rape), R.S. 14:43 (simple or third degree rape), R.S. 14:43.1 (sexual battery), R.S.
14:43.2 (second degree sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.3 (oral sexual battery), R.S.
14:43.5 (intentional exposure to HIV), a second or subsequent conviction of R.S.
14:283.1 (voyeurism), or a second or subsequent conviction of R.S. 14:89.3 (sexual
abuse of an animal), committed on or after June 18, 1992, or committed prior to June
18, 1992, if the person, as a result of the offense, is under the custody of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections on or after June 18, 1992. A conviction
for any offense provided in this definition includes a conviction for the offense under
the laws of another state, or military, territorial, foreign, tribal, or federal law which
is equivalent to an offense provided for in this Chapter, unless the tribal court or
foreign conviction was not obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental
fairness and due process for the accused as provided by the federal guidelines
adopted pursuant to the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 14:283(F) through (H) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 265 ENROLLED
Section 4. This Act shall be cited and referred to as the "Jacob Carter Dignity in
Death Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.